Utah statutes.
58-49-3.   Board created -- Duties.

(1)  There is created the Dietitian Board consisting of four certified dietitians and one member of the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.

